Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3605
Appeal; procedure.

Any person aggrieved by a final decision in a contested case, whether such decision is affirmative or negative in form, is entitled to judicial review under the provisions of sections 25-2728 to 25-2738.

Laws 1963, c. 399, § 5, p. 1275;

Laws 1981, LB 42, § 25.